Mississippi statutes. Title 23. Elections
Subarticle B. Selection of Presidential Electors at General Election.

§ 23-15-781.
Selection of electors of President and Vice-President by qualified electors of state at large.

The number of electors of President and Vice-President of the United States to which this state may be entitled, shall be chosen by the qualified electors of the state at large, on the first Tuesday after the first Monday of November in the year in which an election of President and Vice-President shall occur.

HISTORY:
Derived from 1972 Code §23-5-207 [Codes, Hutchinson’s 1848, ch. 7, art 4 (1); 1857, ch. 4, art 39; 1871, § 362; 1880, § 165; 1892, § 3699; 1906, § 4206; Hemingway’s 1917, § 6842; 1930, § 6268; 1942, § 3297; repealed by Laws, 1986, ch. 495, § 335]; en, Laws, 1986, ch. 495, § 241, eff from and after January 1, 1987.

§ 23-15-783.
Applicability of laws regulating general elections.

The laws regulating the general elections shall in all respects apply to and govern elections of electors of President and Vice-President.

HISTORY:
Derived from 1972 Code §23-5-209 [Codes, Hutchinson’s 1848, ch. 7, art 4 (2); 1857, ch. 4, art 40; 1871, § 380; 1880, § 166; 1892, § 3700; 1906, § 4207; Hemingway’s 1917, § 6843; 1930, § 6269; 1942, § 3298; Laws, 1944, Ex ch. 2; repealed by Laws, 1986, ch. 495, § 335]; en, Laws, 1986, ch. 495, § 242, eff from and after January 1, 1987.

§ 23-15-785.
Certificates of nomination and nominating petitions; preparation of official ballots.

When presidential electors are to be chosen, the Secretary of State of Mississippi shall certify to the circuit clerks of the several counties the names of all candidates for President and Vice President who are nominated by any national convention or other like assembly of any political party or by written petition signed by at least one thousand (1,000) qualified voters of this state.

The certificate of nomination by a political party convention must be signed by the presiding officer and secretary of the convention and by the chairman of the state executive committee of the political party making the nomination. Any nominating petition, to be valid, must contain the signatures as well as the addresses of the petitioners. The certificates and petitions must be filed with the State Board of Election Commissioners by filing them in the Office of the Secretary of State by 5:00 p.m. not less than sixty (60) days previous to the day of the election.

Each certificate of nomination and nominating petition must be accompanied by a list of the names and addresses of persons, who shall be qualified voters of this state, equal in number to the number of presidential electors to be chosen. Each person so listed shall execute the following statement which shall be attached to the certificate or petition when it is filed with the State Board of Election Commissioners: “I do hereby consent and do hereby agree to serve as elector for President and Vice President of the United States, if elected to that position, and do hereby agree that, if so elected, I shall cast my ballot as such for_______________for President and_______________for Vice President of the United States” (inserting in said blank spaces the respective names of the persons named as nominees for said respective offices in the certificate to which this statement is attached).

The State Board of Election Commissioners and any other official charged with the preparation of official ballots shall place on such official ballots the words “PRESIDENTIAL ELECTORS FOR (here insert the name of the candidate for President, the word ‘AND’ and the name of the candidate for Vice President)” in lieu of placing the names of such presidential electors on the official ballots, and a vote cast therefor shall be counted and shall be in all respects effective as a vote for each of the presidential electors representing those candidates for President and Vice President of the United States. In the case of unpledged electors, the State Board of Election Commissioners and any other official charged with the preparation of official ballots shall place on such official ballots the words “UNPLEDGED ELECTOR(S) (here insert the name(s) of individual unpledged elector(s) if placed upon the ballot based upon a petition granted in the manner provided by law stating the individual name(s) of the elector(s) rather than a slate of electors).”

HISTORY:
Derived from 1972 Code §23-5-210 [Laws, 1982, ch. 478, § 1; repealed by Laws, 1986, ch. 495, § 335]; en, Laws, 1986, ch. 495, § 243; Laws, 2010, ch. 373, § 1, eff June 9, 2010 (the date the United States Attorney General interposed no objection under Section 5 of the Voting Rights Act of 1965, to the amendment of this section).

§ 23-15-787.
Notification of persons elected.

The Secretary of State shall, immediately after ascertaining the result, transmit by mail a notice, in writing, to the persons elected.

HISTORY:
Derived from 1972 Code §23-5-211 [Codes, Hutchinson’s 1848, ch. 7, art 4 (6); 1857, ch. 4, art 41; 1871, § 381; 1880, § 167; 1892, § 3701; 1906, § 4208; Hemingway’s 1917, § 6844; 1930, § 6270; 1942, § 3299; repealed by Laws, 1986, ch. 495, § 335]; en, Laws, 1986, ch. 495, § 244, eff from and after January 1, 1987.

§ 23-15-789.
Meeting of electors; voting; appointments to fill vacancies.

The electors chosen shall meet at the seat of government of the state on the first Monday after the second Wednesday in December next following their election, and shall there give their votes for President and Vice-President of the United States, and shall make return thereof agreeably to the laws of the United States; and should any elector so chosen fail to attend and give his vote, the other electors attending shall appoint some person or persons to fill the vacancy or vacancies, who shall attend and vote as electors; and such appointment shall be forthwith reported to the Secretary of State.

HISTORY:
Derived from 1972 Code §23-5-213 [Codes, Hutchinson’s 1848, ch. 7, art 4 (4); 1857, ch. 4, art 42; 1871, § 382; 1880, § 168; 1892, § 3702; 1906, § 4209; Hemingway’s 1917, § 6845; 1930, § 6271; 1942, § 3300; Laws, 1902, ch. 105; Laws, 1944, Ex ch. 4; repealed by Laws, 1986, ch. 495, § 335]; en, Laws, 1986, ch. 495, § 245, eff from and after January 1, 1987.

§ 23-15-791.
Allowance to electors for travel and for attendance.

Each elector shall be allowed the sum of Four Dollars ($4.00) for every twenty (20) miles of travel, to be estimated by the usual land route, in going from his home to and returning from the seat of government to give his vote, and Four Dollars ($4.00) for every day he shall attend there as an elector, to be paid by the State Treasurer, on the warrant of the auditor.

HISTORY:
Derived from 1972 Code §23-5-215 [Codes, Hutchinson’s 1848, ch. 7, art 4 (5); 1857, ch. 4, art 43; 1880, § 169; 1892, § 3703; 1906, § 4210; Hemingway’s 1917, § 6846; 1930, § 6272; 1942, § 3301; repealed by Laws, 1986, ch. 495, § 335]; en, Laws, 1986, ch. 495, § 246, eff from and after January 1, 1987.